Washington statutes.
RCW 35.101.055

Lodging charge—Exemption for temporary medical housing.

The lodging charge authorized in RCW 35.101.050 does not apply to temporary medical housing exempt under RCW 82.08.997, or any lodging business, lodging unit, or lodging guest so designated by the legislative authority.

[ 2024 c 68 s 1; 2008 c 137 s 6.]

NOTES:

Application—2024 c 68: "This act applies to any tourism promotion area established before, on, or after June 6, 2024." [ 2024 c 68 s 2.]

Effective date—2008 c 137: See note following RCW 82.08.997.